Maryland, session 2026, HB1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
SUBTITLE 13. SPECIE AS LEGAL TENDER.
12–1301.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1312*

HOUSE BILL 1312
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “LEGAL TENDER” MEANS A MEDIUM OF EXCHANGE RECOGNIZED
BY THE STATE FOR THE PAYMENT OF DEBTS, TAXES, FEES, AND OTHER
OBLIGATIONS.
(2) “LEGAL TENDER” INCLUDES SPECIE.
(C) “SPECIE” MEANS:
(1) GOLD OR SILVER COIN ISSUED BY THE UNITED STATES OR A
FOREIGN GOVERNMENT; OR
(2) GOLD OR SILVER IN THE FORM OF BARS OR OTHER PHYSICAL
FORM CERTIFIED AS AT LEAST 99% PURE.
12–1302.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) THE USE OF SPECIE AS A MEDIUM OF EXCHANGE HAS A
HISTORICAL BASIS IN FOSTERING ECONOMIC STABILITY;
(2) RECOGNIZING SPECIE AS LEGAL TENDER PROMOTES
COMPETITION IN THE MONETARY SYSTEM AND PROTECTS AGAINST RELIANCE ON
FIAT CURRENCY; AND
(3) ESTABLISHING MECHANISMS FOR THE USE OF PRECIOUS METAL
IN TRANSACTIONS ENHANCES ECONOMIC RESILIENCE IN THE STATE.
12–1303.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON MAY USE
SPECIE FOR THE PAYMENT OF:
(1) DEBTS BETWEEN PRIVATE PARTIES, IF THE PARTIES MUTUALLY
AGREE TO USE SPECIE; AND
(2) TAXES, FEES, OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS OWED TO THE STATE OR A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, IF THE STATE OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION AGREES TO
ACCEPT SPECIE AS PAYMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1312 3
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO ACCEPT SPECIE AS PAYMENT.
12–1304.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSIONER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY A
REPORT DETAILING THE ECONOMIC IMPACT OF RECOGNIZING SPECIE AS LEGAL
TENDER IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.